Idaho, session 2025, H0200.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1702, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1702. LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION. The practice of pharmacy in the
state of Idaho is declared a professional practice affecting the health,
safety and welfare of the public and is subject to regulation and control in


the public interest. It is further declared to be a matter of public interest
and concern that the practice of pharmacy, as defined in this chapter, merits
and receives the confidence of the public and that only qualified persons be
permitted to engage in the practice of pharmacy in or into the state of Idaho.
This chapter shall be liberally construed to carry out these objects and pur-
poses. Only qualified persons shall be permitted to engage in the practice
of pharmacy in or into the state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-1703, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-1704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1704. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "Accredited school or college of pharmacy" means a school or col-
lege that meets the minimum standards of the accreditation council for phar-
macy education and appears on its list of accredited schools or colleges of
pharmacy.
(2) "Board of pharmacy" or "board" means the Idaho state board of phar-
macy.
(3) "Certificate" means a license or registration issued by the board
unless specifically stated.
(4) "Chain pharmacy warehouse" means a physical location for prescrip-
tion drugs that acts as a central warehouse and performs intracompany sales
or transfers of such drugs to a group of chain pharmacies that have the same
common ownership and control.
(5) "Colicensed partner or product" means an instance where two (2) or
more parties have the right to engage in the manufacturing or marketing of
a prescription drug, consistent with the federal food and drug administra-
tion's implementation of the prescription drug marketing act.
(6) "Collaborative pharmacy practice" means a pharmacy practice where
one (1) or more pharmacists or pharmacies jointly agree to work under a pro-
tocol authorized by one (1) or more prescribers to provide patient care and
drug therapy management services not otherwise permitted to be performed by
a pharmacist under specified conditions.
(7) "Compounding" means the practice in which a pharmacist, a pre-
scriber, or, in the case of an outsourcing facility, a person under the
supervision of a pharmacist combines, mixes or alters ingredients of a drug
to create a medication tailored to the needs of an individual patient.
(8) "Counseling" or "counsel" means the effective communication by
the pharmacist of information, as set out in this chapter, to the patient or
caregiver in order to improve therapeutic outcomes by maximizing proper use
of prescription drugs and devices.
(9) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive or at-
tempted transfer of a drug or device from one person to another, whether or
not for a consideration.
(10) "Device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, con-
trivance, implant, in vitro reagent or other similar related article, in-
cluding any component part or accessory that is:


(a) Recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia or official
National Formulary, other drug compendia or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or
the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or other
animal;
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man
or other animal, does not achieve any of its principal intended purposes
through chemical action within or on the body of man or other animal, and
is not dependent upon being metabolized for the achievement of any of
its principal intended purposes.
(11) "Dispense" or "dispensing" means the preparation and delivery of
a drug pursuant to a lawful prescription drug order of a practitioner in a
suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to
or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription.
(12) "Distribute" means the delivery of a drug other than by administer-
ing or dispensing.
(13) "Distributor" means a supplier of drugs manufactured, produced, or
prepared by others to persons other than the ultimate consumer.
(14) "Donation repository" means:
(a) A community health center as defined in section 39-3203, Idaho
Code;
(b) A free medical clinic as defined in section 39-7702, Idaho Code;
(c) A designated regional behavioral health center as described in
chapter 31, title 39, Idaho Code;
(d) A state charitable institution as described in chapter 1, title 66,
Idaho Code; or
(e) A drug outlet as defined in this section.
(15) "Drug" means:
(a) Articles recognized as drugs in the official United States Phar-
macopoeia, official National Formulary, official Homeopathic Pharma-
copoeia, other drug compendia or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment or prevention of disease in man or other animal;
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any
function of the body of man or other animal; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified
in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection.
(16) "Drug enforcement administration" or "DEA" means the United States
drug enforcement administration.
(16) (17) "Drug outlet" means a resident or nonresident pharmacy, busi-
ness entity or other facility subject to registration by the board, pursuant
to section 54-1729, Idaho Code, where employees or personnel are engaged in
the practice of pharmacy, in the provision of pharmaceutical care, or in the
dispensing, delivering, distributing or manufacturing of drugs or devices
in or into Idaho, including limited service outlets.
(17) (18) "Drug therapy management" means selecting, initiating, or
modifying drug treatment pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice
agreement.
(18) "Epinephrine auto-injector" means a single-use device for the au-
tomatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body.


(19) "Food and drug administration" or "FDA" means the United States
food and drug administration.
(20) "Hazardous drug" means any drug listed as such by the national
institute for occupational safety and health or any drug identified by at
least one (1) of the following criteria: carcinogenicity, teratogenicity or
developmental toxicity, reproductive toxicity in humans, organ toxicity at
low doses in humans or animals, genotoxicity, or new drugs that mimic exist-
ing hazardous drugs in structure or toxicity.
(19) (21) "Institutional drug order" means a prescription drug order
issued in the unique form and manner permitted for a patient or resident of
an institutional facility or as permitted for other purposes as defined in
rule. Unless specifically differentiated, state law applicable to a pre-
scription drug order is also applicable to an institutional drug order.
(20) (22) "Institutional facility" means a facility whose primary pur-
pose is to provide a physical environment for patients to obtain health care
services and in which patients spend a majority of their time, as may be fur-
ther defined by board rule.
(21) "Internship" means a practical experience program under the super-
vision of a preceptor.
(22) (23) "Investigational or new drug" means any drug limited by state
or federal law to use under professional supervision of a practitioner au-
thorized by law to prescribe or administer such drug.
(23) (24) "Labeling" means the process of preparing and affixing a la-
bel to any drug container, exclusive however of the labeling by a manufac-
turer, packer or distributor of a nonprescription drug or commercially pack-
aged legend drug or device. Any such label shall include all information re-
quired by federal and state law.
(24) (25) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propaga-
tion, compounding, conversion or processing of a device or a drug, either
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin or
independently by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extrac-
tion and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of
the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container, except that this
term does not include the preparation or compounding of a drug by an individ-
ual for his own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling
of a drug:
(a) By a pharmacist or practitioner as an incident to his administer-
ing, dispensing, or, as authorized by board rule, distributing of a drug
in the course of his professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner or by his authorization under his supervision
for the purpose of or as an incident to research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale.
(25) (26) "Manufacturer" means a person who is licensed or approved by
the federal food and drug administration to engage in the manufacture of
drugs, including a colicensed partner or affiliate of that person, who com-
pounds, cultivates, derives, harvests, mixes, or by other process produces
or prepares legend drugs and includes persons who prepare such drugs in
dosage forms by mixing, compounding, encapsulating, entableting, or other
process, or who packages or repackages such drugs, but does not include phar-
macists or practitioners in the practice of their profession.


(26) "Medically indigent patient" means a resident of Idaho who:
(a) Is not eligible for medicaid or medicare;
(b) Cannot afford private prescription drug insurance; or
(c) Does not have income and other resources available sufficient to
pay for a legend drug.
(27) "Multistate license" means a license, registration, or other cre-
dential for the practice of pharmacy issued by the pharmacy licensing agency
of a state.
(28) "Multistate licensee" means a multistate pharmacist, multistate
pharmacist intern, or multistate technician.
(29) "Multistate pharmacist" means a nonresident pharmacist who is li-
censed by a party state and is not otherwise licensed by the board.
(30) "Multistate pharmacist intern" means a nonresident pharmacist in-
tern who is registered by a party state and is not otherwise licensed by the
board.
(31) "Multistate practice of pharmacy" means the practice of pharmacy
in or into Idaho for a patient located in Idaho by a multistate licensee pur-
suant to the requirements of this section and the terms of a mutual recogni-
tion agreement.
(32) "Multistate technician" means a nonresident technician who is li-
censed by a party state and is not otherwise registered by the board.
(33) (29) "Mutual recognition agreement" means a written agreement en-
tered into between the board and a party state allowing for the multistate
practice of pharmacy, subject to the requirements of this section and any
other reasonable and supplemental contract terms negotiated by the board and
the party state.
(34) (30) "Nonprescription drugs" means medicines or drugs that may be
sold without a prescription drug order and that are prepackaged for use by
the consumer and labeled in accordance with state and federal law.
(35) (31) "Nonresident" means a person or business entity located in the
District of Columbia or a state or territory other than Idaho that practices
pharmacy including, but not limited to, pharmaceutical care services into
Idaho.
(36) (32) "Off-site pharmacy services" means services provided by a
central drug outlet or an off-site pharmacist or technician. Services may
include, but are not limited to: processing a request from another pharmacy
to fill, refill or dispense a prescription drug order; performance of pro-
cessing functions; or providing cognitive or pharmaceutical care services.
Each function may be performed by the same or different persons and at the
same or different locations.
(37) (33) "Opioid antagonist" means naloxone hydrochloride or any other
similarly acting and equally safe drug approved by the federal food and drug
administration for the treatment of drug overdose.
(38) (34) "Outsourcing facility" means a pharmacy or facility that is
registered by the federal food and drug administration pursuant to 21 U.S.C.
353b and either registered or endorsed by the board.
(39) (35) "Party state" means any pharmacy licensing agency of a state
that has entered into a mutual recognition agreement with the board.
(40) (36) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, as-
sociation or any other legal entity.


(41) "Person in charge" or "PIC" means a person whose qualifications,
responsibilities, and reporting requirements are defined in rule.
(42) (37) "Pharmaceutical care" means drug therapy and other
pharmaceutical patient care services provided by a pharmacist intended to
achieve outcomes related to the cure or prevention of a disease, elimination
or reduction of a patient's symptoms, or arresting or slowing of a disease
process as defined in the rules of the board.
(43) (38) "Pharmacist" means an individual licensed by this state to en-
gage in the practice of pharmacy or a pharmacist registered by this state who
is located in another state, territory or the District of Columbia and is en-
gaged in the practice of pharmacy into Idaho, unless exempted.
(44) (39) "Pharmacist intern" means a person who is enrolled in or who
has completed a course of study at an accredited school or college of phar-
macy and is registered with the board as a pharmacist intern prior to com-
mencement of an internship.:
(a) Is enrolled in and in good standing in an accredited school or col-
lege of pharmacy;
(b) Has completed a course of study at an accredited school or college
of pharmacy; or
(c) Is certified by the foreign pharmacy graduate examination commit-
tee (FPGEC) and awaiting final pharmacist licensure.
(45) (40) "Pharmacy" means any drug outlet, facility, department, or
other place where prescription drug orders are filled or compounded and
where prescriptions are sold, dispensed, offered, or displayed for sale and
that has, as its principal purpose, the dispensing of drug and health sup-
plies intended for the general health, welfare, and safety of the public.
(46) (41) "Practice of pharmacy" means the safe interpretation, eval-
uation, compounding, administration, and dispensing of prescription drug
orders, patient counseling, collaborative pharmacy practice, provision of
pharmaceutical care services, proper storage of drugs and devices, and pre-
scribing of drugs and devices as may be further defined in this chapter.
(47) (42) "Practitioner" means a person licensed in this state and per-
mitted by such license to dispense, conduct research with respect to or ad-
minister drugs in the course of professional practice or research in this
state.
(48) "Preceptor" means a pharmacist or other health professional li-
censed and in good standing who supervises the internship training of a
registered pharmacist intern.
(49) "Precursor" means a substance, other than a legend drug, that is an
immediate chemical intermediate that can be processed or synthesized into a
legend drug and is used or produced primarily for use in the manufacture of a
legend drug.
(50) (43) "Prepackaging" means the act of transferring a drug, manually
or using an automated system, from a manufacturer's original container to
another container prior to receiving a prescription drug order.
(51) (44) "Prescriber" means an individual currently licensed, reg-
istered or otherwise authorized to prescribe and administer drugs in the
course of professional practice.
(52) (45) "Prescriber drug outlet" means a drug outlet in which pre-
scription drugs or devices are dispensed directly to patients under the


supervision of a prescriber, except where delivery is accomplished only
through on-site administration or the provision of drug samples, patient
assistance program drugs, or investigational drugs as permitted in chapter
94, title 39, Idaho Code.
(53) (46) "Prescription drug or legend drug" means a drug that under
federal law is required, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled
with one (1) of the following statements:
(a) "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without a prescrip-
tion"; or
(b) "Rx Only"; or
(c) "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order
of a licensed veterinarian";
or a drug that is required by any applicable federal or state law or rule to be
dispensed on prescription drug order only or is restricted to use by practi-
tioners only.
(54) (47) "Prescription drug order" means a valid order of a prescriber
for a drug or device for an ultimate user of the drug or device.
(55) (48) "Primary state of residence" means the multistate licensee's
declared primary state of residence as evidenced by a valid state or federal
identification card with a home address or another form of identification
accepted by the board.
(56) "Prospective drug review" includes, but is not limited to, the fol-
lowing activities:
(a) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for known allergies, ra-
tional therapy contraindications, reasonable dose and route of admin-
istration, and reasonable directions for use;
(b) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for duplication of ther-
apy;
(c) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for drug, food, or dis-
ease interactions; and
(d) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for proper utilization.
(57) (49) "Qualified donor" means:
(a) Any entity that meets the definition of "donation repository" as
provided in this section; or
(b) Any member of the public in accordance with section 54-1762, Idaho
Code.
(50) "Reconstitution" means the process of adding a diluent to a pow-
dered medication to prepare a solution or suspension, according to the prod-
uct's labeling or the manufacturer's instructions.
(58) (51) "Record" means all papers, letters, memoranda, notes, pre-
scriptions, drug orders, invoices, statements, patient medication charts or
files, computerized records or other written indicia, documents or objects
that are used in any way in connection with the purchase, sale or handling of
any drug or device.
(59) (52) "Repackage" means repackaging or otherwise changing the con-
tainer, wrapper, or labeling to further the distribution of a prescription
drug, excluding such actions when completed by the pharmacist responsible
for dispensing product to the patient.
(60) (53) "Reverse distributor" means a drug outlet that receives non-
salable prescription drugs from persons or their agents, who may lawfully


possess prescription drugs without being issued a valid prescription drug
order, and that processes for credit or disposes of such prescription drugs.
(61) (54) "Sale" means every sale and includes:
(a) Manufacturing, processing, transporting, handling, packaging or
any other production, preparation or repackaging;
(b) Exposure, offer, or any other proffer;
(c) Holding, storing or any other possession;
(d) Dispensing, giving, delivering or any other supplying; and
(e) Applying, administering or any other usage.
(62) (55) "Technician" means an individual authorized by registration
with the board to perform pharmacy support services under the direction of a
pharmacist.
(63) (56) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a drug
for his own use or for the use of a member of his household or for administer-
ing to an animal owned by him or by a member of his household.
(64) (57) "USP" means United States pharmacopoeia.
(65) (58) "Veterinary drug outlet" means a prescriber drug outlet that
dispenses drugs or devices intended for animal patients.
(66) (59) "Wholesale distribution" means distribution of prescription
drugs to persons other than a consumer or patient, but does not include:
(a) Drug returns, when conducted by a hospital, health care entity, or
charitable institution in accordance with 21 CFR 203.23;
(b) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase,
or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug pursuant to a prescription;
(c) The delivery of, or offer to deliver, a prescription drug by a
common carrier solely in the common carrier's usual course of business
of transporting prescription drugs when such common carrier does not
store, warehouse, or take legal ownership of the prescription drug; or
(d) The sale or transfer from a community pharmacy or chain pharmacy
warehouse of expired, damaged, mispicked, returned, or recalled pre-
scription drugs to the original manufacturer, original wholesaler, or
third-party returns processor, including a reverse distributor.
(67) (60) "Wholesaler" means a person who, in the usual course of busi-
ness, lawfully distributes drugs or devices in or into Idaho to persons other
than the ultimate user.
SECTION 4. That Section 54-1705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1705. PRACTICE OF PHARMACY -- GENERAL APPROACH. To evaluate
whether a specific act is within the practice of pharmacy in or into Idaho, or
whether an act can be delegated to other individuals under his supervision,
a licensee or registrant of the board of pharmacy shall independently deter-
mine whether:
(1) The act is expressly prohibited by:
(a) This chapter;
(b) The uniform controlled substances act, chapter 27, title 37, Idaho
Code; or
(c) The rules of the board of pharmacy; or
(d) (c) Any other applicable state or federal laws or regulations;


(2) The act is consistent with the individual's education, training,
and experience; and
(3) Performance of the act is within the accepted standard of care that
would be provided in a similar setting by a reasonable and prudent individual
with similar education, training, and experience.
SECTION 5. That Section 54-1706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1706. STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY ESTABLISHED. There is hereby estab-
lished in the division of occupational and professional licenses a state
board of pharmacy whose responsibilities shall be to enforce the provisions
of this act. The board that shall have all of the duties, powers, and author-
ity specifically granted by and necessary to the enforcement of this act, as
well as such other duties, powers and authority as it may be granted from time
to time by appropriate statute chapter.
SECTION 6. That Section 54-1714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 54-1718, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1718. LICENSURE AND DISCIPLINE. (1) The board of pharmacy shall be
responsible for the control and regulation of the practice of pharmacy in
this state, including but not limited to the following:
(a) The licensing by examination or by reciprocity of applicants who
are qualified to engage in the practice of pharmacy under the provisions
of this chapter;
(b) The renewal of licenses to engage in the practice of pharmacy;
(c) The enforcement of the provisions of this chapter relating to the
conduct or competence of pharmacists practicing in this state and the
suspension, revocation or restriction of licenses to practice phar-
macy; and
(d) The regulation of the training, qualifications and employment of
pharmacist interns. pharmacist interns and technicians;
(e) The cancellation of certificates that fail to maintain the require-
ments of this chapter; and
(f) The reinstatement of licenses following the completion of thirty
(30) hours of continuing education within twenty-four (24) months and
compliance with any prior board orders.
(2) The board of pharmacy shall require the following applicants over
the age of eighteen (18) to submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history
check in accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code:
(a) Original applicants for a certificate, unless exempted by board
rule; and
(b) Applicants for reinstatement of a certificate.
SECTION 8. That Section 54-1719, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


54-1719. MEDICATIONS -- DRUGS -- DEVICES -- OTHER MATERIALS DUTIES --
POWERS -- AUTHORITY. (1) The board of pharmacy shall also have the following
responsibilities in regard to medications, drugs, devices and other materi-
als used in this state in the diagnosis, mitigation and treatment or preven-
tion of injury, illness and disease:
(1) (a) The regulation of the sale at retail and the dispensing of med-
ications, drugs, devices and other materials, including the method of
dispensing in institutional facilities and including the right to seize
such drugs, devices and other materials found to be detrimental to the
public health and welfare by the board after appropriate hearing as re-
quired under the administrative procedure act;
(2) The specifications of minimum professional and technical equip-
ment, environment, supplies and procedures for the compounding, dispensing
and distribution of such medications, drugs, devices and other materials
within the practice of pharmacy;
(3) (b) The control of the purity and quality of such medications,
drugs, devices and other materials within the practice of pharmacy; and
(4) (c) The issuance and renewal of certificates of drug outlets for
purposes of ascertaining those persons engaged in the manufacture and
distribution of drugs.
(2) The board may solicit and receive from parties other than the state
grants, moneys, donations, and gifts of tangible and intangible property for
any purpose consistent with the provisions of this chapter, which purposes
may be specified as a condition of any grants, moneys, donations, or gifts.
(3) The board or its authorized representatives shall have power to in-
vestigate and gather evidence concerning alleged violations of the provi-
sions of this chapter. All records required under this chapter shall be made
available for inspection upon request by the board or its authorized agents.
(4) The board shall inspect drug outlets prior to the commencement of
business, if applicable, and at regular intervals.
SECTION 9. That Section 54-1720, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1720, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1720. LICENSING FEES. Non-refundable fees shall be posted by the
division and shall not exceed the amounts specified as follows:
(1) Individual certificates:
Certificate Initial fee, not to Annual renewal fee, not
exceed to exceed
Pharmacist license $140 $130
Nonresident person in
charge $290 $290
Pharmacist intern $50 $50


Technician $35 $35
Practitioner
controlled substance
registration $60 $60
(2) Drug outlet certificates:
Certificate Initial fee, not to Annual renewal fee, not
exceed to exceed
Drug outlet (unless $100 $100
otherwise listed)
Wholesale license $180 $180
Wholesale registration $150 $150
Central drug outlet $500 $250
(nonresident)
Mail service pharmacy $500 $250
Durable medical $50 $50
equipment outlet
Outsourcing facility $500 $250
(nonresident)
Manufacturer $150 $150
Veterinary drug outlet $35 $35
SECTION 11. That Section 54-1721, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1721. UNLAWFUL PRACTICE. (1) It shall be unlawful for any person or
business entity to engage in the practice of pharmacy including, but not lim-
ited to, pharmaceutical care services in or into Idaho unless licensed or
registered to so practice under the provisions of this chapter, except as
provided in this subsection:
(a) Practitioners who are licensed under the laws of this state and
their agents or employees may deliver and administer prescription drugs
to their patients in the practice of their respective professions where
specifically authorized to do so by statute of this state;
(b) Nonresident pharmacists who are actively licensed in their state of
residence may practice pharmacy into Idaho if employed by or affiliated
with and practicing for an Idaho-registered nonresident drug outlet.
Only the PIC of a registered nonresident facility must be registered to
practice into Idaho Only the person in charge of a registered nonres-
ident facility shall be registered to practice into Idaho. All other
nonresident pharmacists who are affiliated with and practicing from a
nonresident facility are exempt from license and registration require-
ments for practice into Idaho;


(c) Multistate licensees permitted to engage in the multistate prac-
tice of pharmacy in or into Idaho pursuant to section 54-1723B, Idaho
Code;
(d) A veterinary drug outlet, as defined in section 54-1704, Idaho
Code, does not need to register with the board if the outlet does not
dispense for outpatient use any controlled substances listed in chapter
27, title 37, Idaho Code, euthanasia drugs, tranquilizer drugs, neuro-
muscular paralyzing drugs or general anesthesia drugs;
(e) Employees of the public health districts established under section
39-408, Idaho Code, shall be permitted to engage in the labeling and de-
livery of prepackaged items pursuant to a valid prescription drug order
and in accordance with a formulary established by the district health
director; and
(f) Researchers may possess legend drugs for use in their usual and law-
ful research projects.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person not legally licensed as a phar-
macist to take, use or exhibit the title of pharmacist or any other title or
description of like import.
(3) Any person who shall be found to have unlawfully engaged in the
practice of pharmacy shall be subject to a fine not to exceed three thousand
dollars ($3,000) for each offense. Each such violation of this chapter or
the rules promulgated hereunder pertaining to unlawfully engaging in the
practice of pharmacy shall also constitute a misdemeanor punishable upon
conviction as provided in the criminal code of this state.
SECTION 12. That Section 54-1722, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1722. QUALIFICATIONS FOR PHARMACIST LICENSURE BY EXAMINATION. (1)
To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy, an applicant for
licensure by examination shall:
(a) Submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board of
pharmacy;
(b) Graduate and receive the first professional degree from an accred-
ited school or college of pharmacy;
(c) Pass the North American pharmacist licensure examination by the
national association of boards of pharmacy or submit a passing score
transfer into Idaho within ninety (90) days after application; and
(d) Pay the fees specified by the board of pharmacy for examination and
issuance of license this chapter.
(2) Any applicant who is a graduate of a school or college of pharmacy
located outside of the United States may substitute the following for sub-
section (1)(b) of this section:
(a) Graduate from a school or college of pharmacy located outside of the
United States;
(b) Submit certification by the foreign pharmacy graduate examination
committee; and
(c) Complete a minimum of one thousand seven hundred forty (1,740)
experiential hours as verified on an employer's affidavit, signed by a
pharmacist licensed and practicing in the United States.


SECTION 13. That Section 54-1723, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1723. QUALIFICATIONS FOR PHARMACIST LICENSURE BY RECIPROCITY. (1)
To obtain a license as a pharmacist by reciprocity, an applicant for licen-
sure shall:
(a) (1) Submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board
of pharmacy;
(b) (2) Possess at the time of initial licensure as a pharmacist such
other qualifications necessary to have been eligible for licensure at that
time in this state;
(c) (3) Present to the board proof of initial licensure by examination
and proof that such license and any other certificate granted to the appli-
cant by any other state or states is not at the time of application suspended,
revoked, canceled or otherwise restricted in a manner preventing the appli-
cant from practicing as a pharmacist for any reason except nonrenewal or the
failure to obtain required continuing education credits in any state where
the applicant is licensed but not engaged in the practice of pharmacy; and
(d) (4) Pay the fees specified by the board of pharmacy for issuance of a
license this chapter.
(2) Eligibility. No applicant shall be eligible for licensure by reci-
procity unless the state in which the applicant was initially licensed as a
pharmacist also grants reciprocal licensure to pharmacists duly licensed by
examination in this state, under like circumstances and conditions.
SECTION 14. That Section 54-1723A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
54-1723A. CERTIFICATE TO ENGAGE IN THE PRACTICE OF PHARMACY INTO
IDAHO. (1) To obtain a certificate to practice as a pharmacist into the state
of Idaho, the applicant shall:
(a) Be licensed and in good standing in the state from which the appli-
cant practices pharmacy;
(b) Submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board;
and
(c) Pay the fee(s) specified by the board for the issuance of the cer-
tificate; and
(d) Comply with all other requirements of the board.
(2) A successful applicant for a certificate under this section shall
be subject to the disciplinary provisions of section 54-1726, Idaho Code,
and the penalty provisions of section 54-1728, Idaho Code, and the rules of
the board.
(3) A successful applicant for a certificate under this section shall
comply with the board's laws and rules laws of this state unless compliance
would violate the laws or rules in the state in which the applicant is lo-
cated.
(4) Renewal shall be required biennially and submitted to the board no
later than the applicant's birthday. The board shall specify by rule the
procedures to be followed and the fees to be paid for renewal of the certifi-
cate.


(5) An applicant who has failed to maintain an Idaho license and who has
not practiced as a pharmacist for the preceding twenty-four (24) months or
longer may, at the board's discretion, be subject to requirements necessary
to demonstrate professional competency.
SECTION 15. That Section 54-1723B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
54-1723B. MULTISTATE PRACTICE OF PHARMACY. Notwithstanding any pro-
vision of law to the contrary:
(1) The board may enter into mutual recognition agreements with one (1)
or more party states provided that each party state:
(a) Has substantially similar requirements for drug outlet registra-
tion as required in section 54-1730, Idaho Code, pharmacist licensure,
as required in section 54-1722, Idaho Code, or pharmacist intern and
technician registration, as required by board rule, or both;
(b) Requires a fingerprint-based criminal history check prior to li-
censure that is substantially similar to the requirement in section
54-1718, Idaho Code; and
(c) Grants the same multistate practice privileges to Idaho drug out-
lets, pharmacists, pharmacist interns, or technicians as Idaho grants
to the party state's drug outlets, pharmacists, pharmacist interns, or
technicians under like circumstances and conditions.
(2) A drug outlet, pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or technician li-
cense issued by a party state will be recognized by the board as permitting
the multistate practice of pharmacy in or into Idaho without a license issued
by the board provided the following conditions are met:
(a) The party state is the primary state of residence for the multistate
licensee;
(b) The multistate licensee holds an active license issued by a party
state that is not currently suspended, revoked, canceled, or otherwise
restricted or conditioned in any manner; and
(c) The requirements specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsec-
tion shall be met at all times by any multistate licensee engaged in the
multistate practice of pharmacy in or into Idaho.
(i) If such a multistate licensee no longer meets the require-
ments in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the multistate licensee
shall apply for licensure in the new primary state of residence
prior to relocating to the new primary state of residence. If the
pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or technician's new primary state
of residence is either Idaho or another party state, the pharma-
cist, pharmacist intern, or technician may continue to practice
until a new license is issued in the new primary state of resi-
dence.
(ii) If a multistate licensee no longer meets the requirements in
paragraph (b) of this subsection, the multistate licensee shall
immediately cease engaging in the multistate practice of pharmacy
in or into Idaho, unless the multistate licensee obtains a license
issued by the board.


(3) A multistate licensee engaged in the multistate practice of phar-
macy in or into Idaho shall comply with all laws governing the practice of
pharmacy in the state of Idaho.
(4) If the board finds grounds for discipline exist, as set forth in
section 54-1726 or 37-2718, Idaho Code, the board may impose upon the mul-
tistate practice privileges of a multistate licensee any of the penalties
set forth in section 54-1728 or 37-2718, Idaho Code. The board's imposition
of any penalties shall be limited to the multistate practice privileges of
a multistate licensee. Only the party state shall have the power to revoke,
suspend, or otherwise discipline a license issued by the party state.
(5) The board shall promptly notify a party state of any board action
taken against the multistate practice privileges of a multistate licensee
licensed by the party state. The party state shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct received from the board as it would if such con-
duct had occurred within the party state.
SECTION 16. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1723C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1723C. RENEWAL OF PHARMACIST LICENSE. To meet the standard of care,
pharmacists are expected to complete sufficient continuing education ger-
mane to the practice of pharmacy to maintain their professional competence.
At license renewal, every pharmacist shall attest that he has maintained
competence through continuing education commensurate with the pharmacist's
active practice setting.
SECTION 17. That Section 54-1725, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 18. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1725, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1725. PHARMACIST INTERN RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS. (1) A pharmacist in-
tern registration shall be obtained prior to commencement of an internship
and shall be renewed biennially. No renewal fee shall be charged if the phar-
macist intern renews the registration annually by July 15.
(2) After graduation, a pharmacist intern application may be extended
for up to twelve (12) months at no cost from the date of application as a phar-
macist. Following an extension, the individual may register as a technician
or petition the board for more time as a pharmacist intern if exceptional
circumstances are present.
SECTION 19. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1725A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1725A. PRACTITIONER CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE REGISTRATION. Any person
needing a controlled substance registration as provided in section 37-2716,
Idaho Code, shall:


(1) Hold a valid state license or registration to prescribe medications
from a licensing authority established under this title;
(2) Obtain a valid DEA registration if required pursuant to federal
law. Failure to obtain such registration, if required, within forty-five
(45) days after issuance of an Idaho controlled substance registration shall
result in automatic cancellation; and
(3) Have an Idaho practice address subject to inspection by the board.
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to nonresident prescribers
who only prescribe into Idaho.
SECTION 20. That Section 54-1726, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1726. GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINE. (1) The board of pharmacy may penal-
ize as set forth in section 54-1728, Idaho Code, a certificate of any person,
pursuant to the procedures set forth in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code,
upon one (1) or more of the following grounds:
(a) Unprofessional conduct as that term is defined by the rules of the
board;, including but not limited to:
(i) Unethical conduct, including fraud, misrepresentation, neg-
ligence, concealment, using false information, or breaching the
public trust;
(ii) A lack of fitness for professional practice due to incompe-
tency, personal habits, drug or alcohol dependence, on-duty in-
toxication or impairment, or any other cause that endangers the
public;
(iii) Diversion of drug products and devices, unlawful possession
or use of drugs, excessive provision of controlled substances,
or violating provisions of the federal or state controlled sub-
stances laws;
(iv) Failing to follow the instructions of the person ordering a
prescription, except as provided in this chapter;
(v) Providing substandard, misbranded, or adulterated drugs or
drugs made using secret formulas;
(vi) Acts or omissions within the practice of pharmacy that fail
to meet the standard of care provided by other licensees or regis-
trants in the same or similar setting;
(vii) Directly promoting or inducing health care services or prod-
ucts that are unnecessary or not medically indicated; or
(viii) Failure to follow an order of the board, comply with an in-
spection or investigation, or promptly remediate inspection defi-
ciencies;
(b) Incapacity of a nature that prevents a person from engaging in the
practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence and safety to
the public;
(c) Being found guilty, convicted or having received a withheld judg-
ment or suspended sentence by a court of competent jurisdiction in this
state or any other state of one (1) or more of the following:
(i) Any crime deemed relevant in accordance with section
67-9411(1), Idaho Code;


(ii) Any act related to the qualifications, functions or duties of
a licensee or registrant; or
(iii) Violations of the pharmacy or drug laws of this state or
rules pertaining thereto, or of statutes, rules or regulations of
any other state, or of the federal government;
(d) Fraud or intentional misrepresentation by a licensee or registrant
in securing the issuance or renewal of a certificate;
(e) Engaging or aiding and abetting an individual to engage in the prac-
tice of pharmacy without a certificate or falsely using the title of
pharmacist; and
(f) Being found by the board to be in violation of any of the provisions
of this chapter, or chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code, or rules adopted
pursuant to either chapter.
(2) Nonresident licensees and registrants shall be held accountable to
the board for violations by its agents and employees and subject to the same
grounds for discipline and penalties for their actions as set forth herein.
SECTION 21. That Section 54-1728, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1728. PENALTIES AND REINSTATEMENT INTERVALS. (1) Upon the finding
of the existence of grounds for discipline of any person or business entity
holding, seeking, or renewing a certificate under the provisions of this
chapter, the board of pharmacy may impose any of the following penalties:
(a) Suspension of the offender's certificate for a term to be deter-
mined by the board;
(b) Revocation of the offender's certificate;
(c) Restriction of the offender's certificate to prohibit the offender
from performing certain acts or from engaging in the practice of phar-
macy in a particular manner for a term to be determined by the board;
(d) Refusal to issue or renew the offender's certificate;
(e) Placement of the offender on probation and supervision by the board
for a period to be determined by the board; or
(f) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand
dollars ($2,000) for each occurrence providing a basis for discipline.
(2) Whenever it appears that grounds for discipline exist under this
chapter and the board finds that there is an immediate danger to the public
health, safety, or welfare, the board is authorized to commence emergency
proceedings to suspend, revoke, or restrict the certificate. Such proceed-
ings shall be promptly instituted and processed. Any person whose certifi-
cate has been disciplined pursuant to this subsection can contest the emer-
gency proceedings and appeal under the applicable provisions of chapter 52,
title 67, Idaho Code.
(3) The board may take any action against a nonresident licensee or reg-
istrant that the board can take against a resident licensee or registrant for
violation of the laws of this state or the state in which it resides.
(4) The board may report any violation by a nonresident licensee or reg-
istrant, or its agent or employee, of the laws and rules of this state, the
state in which it resides or the United States to any appropriate state or
federal regulatory or licensing agency including, but not limited to, the


regulatory agency of the state in which the nonresident licensee or regis-
trant is a resident.
(5) The suspension, revocation, restriction or other action taken
against a licensee or registrant by a state licensing board with author-
ity over a licensee's or registrant's professional certificate or by the
drug enforcement administration may result in the board's issuance of an
order likewise suspending, revoking, restricting or otherwise affecting
the certificate in this state, without further proceeding, but subject to
the effect of any modification or reversal by the issuing state or the drug
enforcement administration.
(6) The assessment of costs and fees incurred in the investigation
and prosecution or defense of a person holding, seeking, or renewing a cer-
tificate under this chapter shall be governed by the provisions of section
12-117(5), Idaho Code.
(7) Any person or business entity whose certificate to practice phar-
macy in this state has been suspended, revoked, or restricted pursuant to
this chapter, whether voluntarily or by action of the board, shall have the
right, at reasonable intervals, to petition the board for reinstatement of
such certificate. Such petition shall be made in writing and in the form pre-
scribed by the board. Upon investigation and hearing, the board may in its
discretion grant or deny such petition, or it may modify its original finding
to reflect any circumstances which that have changed sufficiently to warrant
such modifications.
(8) Nothing herein shall be construed as barring criminal prosecutions
for violations of the act where such violations are deemed as criminal of-
fenses in other statutes of this state or of the United States.
(9) All final decisions by the board shall be subject to judicial review
pursuant to the procedures of the administrative procedure act.
SECTION 22. That Section 54-1729, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1729. REGISTRATION AND LICENSURE OF FACILITIES. (1) All drug or de-
vice outlets doing business in or into Idaho shall:
(a) If a nonresident, be licensed or registered and in good standing in
the applicant's state of residence and, if a pharmacy, have a PIC who
is registered by the board person in charge who is licensed and in good
standing in the nonresident state and registered by the board on a form
approved by the board;
(b) Submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board
with information about ownership and location; and
(c) Pay the fee or fees specified by the board for the issuance of the
certificate this chapter.
(2) Each drug or device outlet shall apply for a certificate in one (1)
of the following classifications prior to doing business in or into Idaho:
(a) Resident drug outlet;
(b) Nonresident drug outlet;
(c) Manufacturer;
(d) Wholesaler; or
(e) Prescriber drug outlet.


(3) The board shall establish by rule under the powers granted to it un-
der sections 54-1718 and 54-1719, Idaho Code, the criteria that each outlet
with employees or personnel engaged in the practice of pharmacy must meet to
qualify for registration or licensure in each classification designated in
subsection (2) of this section. The board may issue various types of cer-
tificates with varying restrictions to such outlets designated in subsec-
tion (2) of this section where the board deems it necessary by reason of the
type of outlet requesting a certificate.
(4) (3) It shall be lawful for any outlet or facility to sell and dis-
tribute nonprescription drugs. Outlets engaging in the sale and distribu-
tion of such items shall not be deemed to be improperly engaged in the prac-
tice of pharmacy. No rule will be adopted by the board under this chapter
that requires the sale of nonprescription drugs by a pharmacist or under the
supervision of a pharmacist or otherwise applies to or interferes with the
sale and distribution of such medicines.
(4) Following the issuance of a new license or registration, each fa-
cility shall be inspected to confirm that the facility is compliant with ap-
plicable law.
(5) If the regulatory board or licensing authority of the state in which
a nonresident outlet is located fails or refuses to conduct an inspection or
fails to obtain records or reports required by the board, upon reasonable no-
tice to the nonresident outlet, the board may conduct an inspection. Nonres-
ident outlets shall also pay the actual costs of the out-of-state inspection
of the outlet, including the transportation, lodging and related expenses of
the board's inspector.
(6) A successful applicant for a certificate under the provisions of
this section shall be subject to the disciplinary provisions of section
54-1726, Idaho Code, and the penalty provisions of section 54-1728, Idaho
Code, and the rules of the board.
(7) A successful applicant for a certificate under the provisions of
this section shall comply with the board's laws and the rules of this state
unless compliance would violate the laws, regulations, or rules in the state
in which the licensee or registrant is located.
(8) Renewal shall be required biennially and submitted to the board in
accordance with the provisions of section 67-2614, Idaho Code. The board
shall specify by rule the procedures to be followed and the fees to be paid
for renewal of a certificate.
SECTION 23. That Section 54-1729A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
54-1729A. WHOLESALE DRUG DISTRIBUTOR -- LICENSURE. (1) In addition
to meeting federal requirements, every business entity that engages in the
wholesale distribution of prescription drugs, durable medical equipment, or
pseudoephedrine products in or into Idaho must shall be licensed by the board
as a wholesale distributor, except:
(a) Manufacturers distributing their own federal food and drug ad-
ministration-approved drugs and devices, including distribution of
prescription drug samples by manufacturers' representatives and in-
tracompany sales, meaning any transaction or transfer between any
division, subsidiary, parent, or affiliated or related company under


common ownership and control of a corporate entity or any trans-
fer between colicensees of a colicensed product, unless particular re-
quirements are deemed necessary and appropriate following rulemaking;
(b) An entity that donates prescription drugs, when conducted in accor-
dance with sections 54-1760 through 54-1765, Idaho Code;
(c) A pharmacy distributing in accordance with section 54-1732, Idaho
Code; and
(d) Persons selling, purchasing, distributing, trading, or transfer-
ring a prescription drug for emergency medical reasons.
(2) The board shall not issue a wholesale distributor license to an
applicant unless the board determines that the designated representative
meets the following qualifications:
(a) Is actively involved in and aware of the actual daily operation of
the wholesale distributor; and
(b) Is physically present at the facility of the applicant during regu-
lar business hours, except when the absence of the designated represen-
tative is authorized, including but not limited to sick leave and vaca-
tion leave.; and
(c) Has disclosed under oath any felony convictions, any conviction of
the applicant related to wholesale or retail prescription drug distri-
bution, or any discipline by a state regulatory agency related to whole-
sale or retail prescription drug distribution.
(3) All applicant-designated representatives shall submit to a fin-
gerprint-based criminal history check in accordance with section 67-9411A,
Idaho Code.
(4) A wholesale distributor shall have adequate processes in place for
monitoring purchase activity of customers and identifying suspicious order-
ing patterns that indicate potential diversion or criminal activity related
to controlled substances such as orders of unusual size, orders deviating
substantially from a normal pattern, orders for drugs that are outside of the
prescriber's scope of practice, or orders of unusual frequency.
(5) The board may adopt rules to approve an accreditation body to eval-
uate a wholesaler's operations to determine compliance with professional
standards and any other applicable laws and to perform inspections of each
facility and location where wholesale distribution operations are conducted
by the wholesaler.
(5) The board shall recognize a wholesaler's accreditation by the na-
tional association of boards of pharmacy for purposes of reciprocity and
satisfying the new drug outlet inspection required by this chapter.
SECTION 24. That Section 54-1730, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 25. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1730, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1730. DRUG OUTLET MINIMUM FACILITY STANDARDS. Each resident drug
outlet shall meet the following minimum facility standards:


(1) Be constructed and equipped with adequate security to protect its
equipment, records and supply of drugs, devices and other restricted sale
items from unauthorized access, acquisition, or use;
(2) Store controlled substances in accordance with federal law;
(3) Restrict access to the area where prescription drugs are prepared,
compounded, distributed, dispensed, or stored to authorized personnel;
(4) Maintain staff sufficient to operate safely and remain open during
the hours posted to the public; and
(5) If dispensing more than twenty (20) prescriptions per day, maintain
an electronic recordkeeping system to store patient medication records.
Such system shall have audit trail functionality that documents the iden-
tity of each individual involved in each step of processing, filling, and
dispensing or, alternatively, the identity of the pharmacist or prescriber
responsible for the accuracy of such processes.
SECTION 26. That Section 54-1731, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 27. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1731, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1731. DRUG OUTLET AND LICENSEE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) All
drug outlets shall report to the board of pharmacy:
(a) At least ten (10) days prior, the occurrence of a change of location
or permanent closing, including notice of the proposed new location of
prescription files and the location where the closing inventory record
of controlled substances will be retained;
(b) As soon as possible, the occurrence of any disaster, accident, or
emergency that affects safe and continued operation;
(c) On the same day as such report is made to the DEA, any theft or loss
of controlled substances; and
(d) Within thirty (30) days, a change of the operating legal entity's
majority ownership.
(2) Authorized distributors shall report specified data on controlled
substances each month in a form and manner prescribed by the board.
(3) All licensees shall report changes in information provided on or
with renewal application forms within thirty (30) days of such changes.
(4) All licensees shall report the following within thirty (30) days
after the final action:
(a) All felony and other criminal convictions involving any legend
drug;
(b) Any disciplinary action from any other licensing authority; and
(c) The surrender of a license in lieu of discipline from any other li-
censing authority.
SECTION 28. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1731A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


54-1731A. DRUG OUTLETS THAT DISPENSE PRESCRIPTION DRUGS -- MINIMUM
REQUIREMENTS. All drug outlets shall:
(1) Dispense prescription drugs only pursuant to a valid prescription
drug order as set forth in this chapter;
(2) Provide prospective drug review that shall include evaluation of a
prescription drug order for known allergies, rational therapy contraindica-
tions, reasonable dose and route of administration, reasonable directions
for use, duplication of therapy, drug interactions, and proper utilization;
(3) Provide a complete and accurate label as set forth in this chapter;
(4) Verify the accuracy of the drug stock selected relative to the drug
prescribed. If not performed by a pharmacist, an electronic verification
system or verification by two (2) support persons shall be necessary; and
(5) Provide counseling for new medications. For refills or renewed
prescriptions an offer to counsel the patient or caregiver shall be ex-
tended. Nothing in this section shall require a pharmacist to provide coun-
seling when a patient or caregiver refuses such counseling, when counseling
is otherwise impossible, or for inpatients of a hospital or institutional
facility if a licensed health care professional administers the medication.
SECTION 29. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1731B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1731B. DRUG OUTLETS WITH ALTERNATIVE DISPENSING MODELS. (1) A drug
outlet that dispenses prescription drugs to human patients that does not
have a pharmacist or other prescriber on site to supervise pharmacy opera-
tions shall:
(a) Maintain adequate video surveillance and retain a recording for a
minimum of thirty (30) days. Provided, however, that self-service au-
tomated dispensing systems shall be excluded from the requirements of
this paragraph;
(b) Use an audio communication system to counsel and interact with each
patient or patient's caregiver; and
(c) Remain closed to the public if either of the systems required pur-
suant to paragraphs (a) or (b) of this subsection are not functioning
properly.
(2) A drug outlet that stores drugs outside of a drug outlet for re-
trieval by a licensed health care professional shall comply with the follow-
ing:
(a) Drugs shall remain under the control of, and be routinely monitored
and inventoried by, the supervising drug outlet; and
(b) The storage area shall be appropriately equipped to ensure security
and prevent diversion or tampering;
(3) Stocking and replenishing of a drug outlet that stores drugs out-
side of a drug outlet for retrieval by a licensed health care professional
may be performed by a pharmacist or prescriber or an appropriate support per-
son if using an electronic verification system or a verification by two sup-
port persons.


SECTION 30. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1731C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1731C. DRUG OUTLET RECORDKEEPING REQUIREMENTS. (1) Unless oth-
erwise provided for in this chapter, prescription records and any other
records required by this chapter shall be maintained for at least three (3)
years after the date of a transaction. Prescription records may be retained
at a central location or may be stored and maintained electronically pro-
vided that such records remain legible. All records shall be produced within
seventy-two (72) hours.
(2) Each drug outlet shall maintain a current, complete, and accurate
record of each controlled substance manufactured, imported, received, or-
dered, sold, delivered, exported, dispensed, or otherwise disposed of by the
registrant. Pursuant to the requirements of this subsection:
(a) A biennial inventory shall be conducted at each registered location
not later than seven (7) days after the date of the most recent inventory
in a form and manner that satisfies the inventory requirements of fed-
eral law; and
(b) Evidence of an amount of a controlled substance that differs from
the amount reflected on a record or inventory shall create a rebuttable
presumption that the registrant has failed to keep records or maintain
inventories pursuant to the requirements of this chapter.
(3) Wholesalers and other entities engaged in wholesale drug distribu-
tion shall maintain inventories and records that include, at a minimum:
(a) The source of drugs, including the name and principal address of
the seller or transferor, and the address of the location from which the
drugs were shipped;
(b) The identity, quantity, and dates of receipt and distribution of
drugs received and distributed or disposed of; and
(c) Controlled substance distribution invoices.
SECTION 31. That Section 54-1732, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1732. VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES. (1) No drug outlet designated in
section 54-1729, Idaho Code, shall be operated until a certificate has been
issued to said facility by the board. Upon the finding of a violation of this
subsection, the board may impose one (1) or more of the penalties enumerated
in section 54-1728, Idaho Code.
(2) Reinstatement of a certificate that has been suspended, revoked
or restricted by the board may be granted in accordance with the procedures
specified in section 54-1728(7), Idaho Code.
(3) The following acts, or the failure to act, and the causing of any
such act or failure are unlawful:
(a) The sale, delivery or administration of any prescription drug
or legend drug, except an emergency medication pursuant to section
54-1735, Idaho Code, unless:
(i) Such legend drug is dispensed or delivered by a pharmacist or
prescriber upon an original prescription, drug order or prescrip-
tion drug order by a practitioner in good faith in the course of his


practice. Any person violating the provisions of this subpara-
graph shall be guilty of a felony and on conviction thereof shall
be imprisoned in the state penitentiary for a term not to exceed
three (3) years, or punished by a fine of not more than five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment; or
(ii) In the case of a legend drug dispensed to a person, there is
a label affixed to the immediate container in which such drug is
dispensed. Any person violating this subparagraph shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not
more than five hundred dollars ($500). Nothing in this subpara-
graph prohibits a practitioner from delivering professional sam-
ples of legend drugs in their original containers in the course of
his practice when oral directions for use are given at the time of
such delivery.
(b) The refilling of any prescription or drug order for a legend drug,
except as designated on the prescription or drug order or by the autho-
rization of the practitioner, or in accordance with board rule. Any
person guilty of violating the provisions of this paragraph shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be incarcer-
ated in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year or punished
by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such
fine and incarceration.
(c) The possession or use of a legend drug or a precursor, except an
emergency medication pursuant to section 54-1735, Idaho Code, by any
person unless such person obtains such drug on the prescription or drug
order of a practitioner. Any person guilty of violating the provisions
of this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
thereof shall be incarcerated in the county jail for a term not to exceed
one (1) year or punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars
($1,000), or by both such fine and incarceration.
(d) The wholesale distribution of drugs or devices by a pharmacy except
for:
(i) The sale, transfer, merger or consolidation of all or part of
the business of a pharmacy or pharmacies from or with another phar-
macy or pharmacies, whether accomplished as a purchase and sale of
stock or business assets;
(ii) The sale of minimal quantities of prescription drugs to prac-
titioners for office use or to dispensing drug outlets for a spe-
cific patient need;
(iii) The sale of a prescription drug for emergency medical rea-
sons, but never to a wholesale distributor;
(iv) Intracompany sales of prescription drugs, meaning any trans-
action or transfer between any division, subsidiary, parent or af-
filiated or related company under common ownership and control of
a corporate entity, or any transaction or transfer between coli-
censees or a colicensed product, but never to a wholesale distrib-
utor; or
(v) Other exemptions as permitted by federal law.
(e) The failure to keep records as required by the board this chapter.
Any person guilty of violating the provisions of this paragraph shall be


guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be incarcer-
ated in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year or punished
by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such
fine and incarceration.
(f) The refusal to make available and to accord full opportunity to
check any record, as required by the board. Any person guilty of vio-
lating the provisions of this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and upon conviction thereof shall be incarcerated in the county jail for
a term not to exceed one (1) year or punished by a fine of not more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and incarceration.
(g) It is unlawful to:
(i) Obtain or attempt to obtain a legend drug or procure or at-
tempt to procure the administration of a legend drug: by fraud,
deceit, misrepresentation or subterfuge; by the forgery or alter-
ation of a prescription, drug order, or of any written order; by
the concealment of a material fact; or by the use of a false name or
the giving of a false address;
(ii) Communicate information to a practitioner in an effort un-
lawfully to procure a legend drug, or unlawfully to procure the ad-
ministration of any such drug. Any such communication shall not be
deemed a privileged communication;
(iii) Intentionally make a false statement in any prescription,
drug order, order, report or record required by this chapter;
(iv) For the purpose of obtaining a legend drug to falsely assume
the title of, or represent himself to be, a manufacturer, whole-
saler, dispenser, prescriber, or other person;
(v) Make or utter any false or forged prescription or false drug
order or forged written order;
(vi) Affix any false or forged label to a package or receptacle
containing legend drugs. This subparagraph does not apply to law
enforcement agencies or their representatives while engaged in
enforcing state and federal drug laws; or
(vii) Wholesale or retail any prescription or legend drug to any
person in this state not entitled by law to deliver such drug to
another.
Every violation of paragraph (g)(i) through (vi) of this subsection shall
be a misdemeanor, and any person convicted thereof shall be incarcerated in
the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year or fined not more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000), or punished by both such fine and imprison-
ment. Any person violating paragraph (g)(vii) of this subsection is guilty
of a felony and on conviction thereof shall be imprisoned in the state peni-
tentiary for a term not to exceed three (3) years or punished by a fine of not
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both such fine and imprison-
ment.
(4) The ultimate user of a legend drug who has lawfully obtained such
legend drug may deliver, without being registered, the legend drug to an-
other person for the purpose of disposal of the legend drug if the person re-
ceiving the legend drug for purposes of disposal is authorized under a state
or federal law or regulation to engage in such activity.


SECTION 32. That Section 54-1733, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1733. VALIDITY OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDERS. (1) A prescription
drug order for a legend drug is valid only if it is issued by a prescriber for
a legitimate medical purpose arising from a prescriber-patient relation-
ship that includes a documented patient evaluation adequate to establish
diagnoses, if applicable, and identify underlying conditions and/or con-
traindications to the treatment. A valid prescriber-patient relationship
may be established through virtual care technologies, provided that the ap-
plicable Idaho community standard of care must be satisfied.
(2) A valid prescription may not be antedated or postdated or have evi-
dence of alteration by any person other than the person who wrote it.
(2) (3) A prescriber who is otherwise authorized to perform any of the
activities listed in this section may prescribe or perform any of the fol-
lowing activities for a patient with whom the prescriber does not have a pre-
scriber-patient relationship under the following circumstances:
(a) Writing initial admission orders for a newly hospitalized patient;
(b) Writing a prescription drug order for a patient of another pre-
scriber for whom the prescriber is taking call;
(c) Writing a prescription drug order for a patient examined by a physi-
cian assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or other licensed
practitioner with whom the prescriber has a supervisory or collabora-
tive relationship;
(d) Writing a prescription drug order for a medication on a short-term
basis for a new patient prior to the patient's first appointment;
(e) Writing a prescription for an emergency medication pursuant to sec-
tion 54-1735, Idaho Code;
(f) In emergency situations where the life or health of the patient is
in imminent danger;
(g) In emergencies that constitute an immediate threat to the public
health including, but not limited to, empiric treatment or prophylaxis
to prevent or control an infectious disease outbreak; and
(h) If a prescriber makes a diagnosis of an infectious disease in a
patient, prescribe or dispense antimicrobials to an individual who
has been exposed to the infectious person in accordance with clinical
guidelines.
(3) (4) Treatment, including issuing a prescription drug order, based
solely on a static online questionnaire does not constitute a legitimate
medical purpose.
(4) (5) A prescription drug order shall be issued only by a prescriber
including a prescriber who is licensed in a jurisdiction other than the
state of Idaho and is permitted by such license to prescribe legend drugs in
the course of his professional practice as long as the individual is acting
within the jurisdiction, scope and authority of his license when issuing the
prescription drug order.
(5) (6)(a) The following acts shall be unlawful:
(a) (i) To knowingly issue an invalid prescription drug order for
a legend drug;


(b) (ii) To knowingly dispense a legend drug pursuant to an in-
valid prescription drug order; or
(c) (iii) To prescribe drugs to individuals without a prescriber-
patient relationship, unless excepted in this section.; or
(iv) To issue a controlled substance prescription for the pre-
scriber's own use.
(b) Such acts shall constitute unprofessional conduct and the pre-
scriber or dispenser shall be subject to discipline according to the
provisions of the Idaho Code chapter pursuant to which the prescriber or
dispenser is licensed, certified or registered.
SECTION 33. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1733A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1733A. PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDER MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS. (1) A pre-
scription drug order may be transmitted by delivery of the original signed
written prescription or a digital image of the order, or by a prescriber,
prescriber's agent, or representative of a state-licensed or federally
certified provider community either electronically, verbally, or via fac-
simile.
(2) Each prescription drug order shall include at least the following:
(a) The name of the patient or authorized entity, and, if for an animal,
the species;
(b) If a controlled substance, the patient's address;
(c) The date issued;
(d) The drug name, strength, and quantity;
(e) Directions for use;
(f) The name of the prescriber, and, if a controlled substance, the ad-
dress and DEA registration number; and
(g) The signature of the prescriber or, if a renewal of a previous pre-
scription, the prescriber's authorized agent.
(3) A provider may omit drug information and directions and, instead,
make an indication for the pharmacist to finalize the patient's drug therapy
plan.
SECTION 34. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1733B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1733B. FILLING PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDERS -- LIMITATIONS. (1) Drug
product selection is only allowed between therapeutic equivalent drugs as
published in the FDA orange book or green book. If a prescriber orders that a
brand name drug shall be dispensed, then no drug product selection is permit-
ted.
(2) Partial fillings shall be allowed as long as the total quantity dis-
pensed does not exceed the total quantity prescribed.
(3) A prescription drug order may be refilled as authorized by the pre-
scriber and within the limits of federal law. A pharmacist may also refill a
prescription to ensure continuity of care.
(4) A pharmacist may:


(a) Change the quantity of medication prescribed if any of the follow-
ing apply: the quantity or package size is not commercially available,
the change is related to a change in dosage form, strength or therapeu-
tic interchange, the change is intended to synchronize a patient's med-
ications, or if it is to dispense the total amount authorized by the pre-
scriber;
(b) Change the dosage form if it is in the best interest of patient care,
as long as the directions are also modified to equate to an equivalent
amount of the drug dispensed as prescribed; and
(c) Complete missing information on the prescription if there is evi-
dence to support the change.
(5) Drug product substitutions in which a pharmacist dispenses a drug
product other than that prescribed are only allowed as follows:
(a) Pursuant to a formulary or drug list of a pharmacy and therapeutics
committee of a hospital;
(b) At the direction of the quality assessment and assurance committee
of an institutional facility;
(c) For interchangeable biosimilar products published in the FDA pur-
ple book, if the name of the drug and the manufacturer or the national
drug code number is documented in the patient's medical record; and
(d) Therapeutic interchange within the same therapeutic class is al-
lowed if the substitution lowers the cost to the patient or occurs dur-
ing a drug shortage.
SECTION 35. That Section 54-1734, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 36. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1734, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1734. PHARMACIST PRESCRIBING -- GENERAL REQUIREMENTS. (1) A phar-
macist may independently prescribe if such pharmacist:
(a) Only prescribes drugs for conditions for which the pharmacist is
educationally prepared and for which competence has been achieved and
maintained;
(b) Only issues a prescription for a legitimate medical purpose arising
from a patient-prescriber relationship;
(c) Obtains adequate information about the patient's health status to
make appropriate decisions based on the applicable standard of care and
the best available evidence;
(d) Recognizes the limits of the pharmacist's own knowledge and experi-
ence and consults with and refers to other health care professionals as
appropriate; and
(e) Maintains documentation adequate to justify the care provided, in-
cluding but not limited to the information collected as part of the pa-
tient assessment, diagnosis, prescription record, provider notifica-
tion, and follow-up care plan.
(2) The general requirements provided for in this section do not apply
to the prescribing of devices and nonprescription drugs, prescribing under a


collaborative pharmacy practice agreement, direct administration of a medi-
cation, or prescribing emergency drugs authorized under this chapter.
SECTION 37. That Section 54-1736, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 38. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1736, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1736. PRESCRIPTION DRUG LABELING STANDARDS. (1) All prescription
drugs shall be in an appropriate container bearing a label in conformance
with federal law.
(2) For parenteral admixtures, the label shall include the date and
time of the addition or the beyond use date.
(3) For prepackaged products, the label shall include an expiration
date that is the lesser of the manufacturer's original expiration date, one
(1) year from the date the drug is prepackaged, or a shorter period if war-
ranted.
(4) For repackaged drugs, the label shall include the prescription num-
ber and contact information for the original dispensing pharmacy, a state-
ment indicating that the drug has been repackaged, and contact information
for the repackager.
SECTION 39. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1736A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1736A. PRESCRIPTION DRUG DELIVERY AND RETURN. (1) Delivery of
filled prescriptions shall be allowed if appropriate measures are taken to
ensure product integrity and safety. Prescriptions may be picked up for or
returned from delivery by authorized personnel from a secured delivery area.
(2) A drug outlet registered with the DEA as a collector may collect
controlled and non-controlled drugs for destruction. Otherwise a dispensed
drug or device may only be accepted for return as follows:
(a) When the pharmacist determines that harm could result if the drug or
device is not returned;
(b) If it is a legend drug for donation pursuant to sections 54-1760
through 54-1764, Idaho Code; and
(c) The drug did not reach the patient and has been maintained in the
custody and control of the drug outlet and the drug outlet is able to as-
sure that product integrity has been maintained.
SECTION 40. That Section 54-1738, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1738. PROOF THAT A DRUG IS A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR LEGEND DRUG --
COMMON NUISANCE. (1) The following shall constitute prima facie evidence in
any criminal or civil proceeding in this state that a drug is a prescription
drug or legend drug:


(1) (a) In the case of a drug for which a new drug application was sub-
mitted to the United States food and drug administration, the affidavit
of an officer having legal custody of the official records of the United
States food and drug administration stating that such records show that
the new drug application was approved, setting forth the date of ap-
proval, and further stating that the records show that proposed label-
ing for the drug which includes the legend "Caution: Federal law pro-
hibits dispensing without a prescription" was approved. The affidavit
shall be accompanied by a certificate that such officer has the custody.
(2) (b) In the case of a drug for which the United States food and drug
administration does not require an approved new drug application as a
condition for marketing the drug, the affidavit of an officer having
legal custody of the official records of the United States food and drug
administration stating that such records reflect that the drug meets
the criteria of federal law to be regarded as a prescription drug and is
required to bear the legend "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing
without a prescription." The affidavit shall be accompanied by a cer-
tificate that such officer has the custody.
(3) (c) In the case of a drug designated a prescription drug by action
of the state board of pharmacy, independently of federal law, the af-
fidavit of an officer having legal custody of the records of the state
board of pharmacy stating that such records show that the drug has been
denominated a prescription drug, to which shall be attached a copy of
the official document evidencing such action. The affidavit shall be
accompanied by a certificate that such officer has the custody.
(4) (2) This section does not prevent proof that a drug is a prescrip-
tion or legend drug by any method authorized by any applicable statute, rule
of procedure or rule of evidence.
(3) Any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling house, apartment, building,
vehicle, boat, aircraft, or any place whatsoever used by any person for the
purpose of unlawfully using any legend drug, or used for the unlawful keeping
or selling of the same, is a common nuisance. No person shall keep or main-
tain such a common nuisance or frequent or visit such place knowing that it is
used for any such purpose.
SECTION 41. That Section 54-1739, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 42. That Section 54-1760, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1760. SHORT TITLE. Sections 54-1760 through 54-1765 54-1764, Idaho
Code, shall be known and may be cited as the "Idaho Legend Drug Donation Act."
SECTION 43. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1765, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1765. COMPOUNDING DRUG PREPARATIONS -- GENERAL PROVISIONS. (1) Any
compounding that is not permitted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
is considered manufacturing.


(2) The provisions of subsections (3) through (7) of this section apply
to any person authorized to engage in the practice of non-sterile compound-
ing, sterile compounding, and sterile prepackaging of drug products in or
into Idaho but shall not apply to:
(a) The reconstitution of a non-sterile drug or sterile drug for imme-
diate administration;
(b) The addition of a flavoring agent or coloring agent to a drug prod-
uct, as long as the agent is therapeutically inert and in the minimum
quantity necessary; or
(c) Product preparation of a non-sterile, non-hazardous drug according
to the manufacturer's FDA approved labeling.
(3) Any person engaging in compounding pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Obtain all active pharmaceutical ingredients from an FDA regis-
tered manufacturer;
(b) Unless the active pharmaceutical ingredient complies with the
standards of an applicable USP-NF monograph, obtain a certificate of
analysis for all active pharmaceutical ingredients procured for com-
pounding and retained for a period of not less than three (3) years from
the date the container is emptied, expired, returned, or disposed of.
The certificate shall contain the product name, lot number, expiration
date, and assay;
(c) Use equipment and utensils of suitable design and composition and
that are cleaned, sanitized, or sterilized as appropriate prior to use;
and
(d) Remove unknown or questionable products from stock and isolate such
products for return, reclamation, or destruction.
(4) Compounding any drug products for human use that the FDA has iden-
tified as presenting demonstrable difficulties in compounding or has with-
drawn or removed from the market is prohibited.
(5) A drug product that is commercially available may only be com-
pounded if not compounded regularly or in inordinate amounts or if the
commercial product is not reasonably available in the market in time to meet
a patient's needs.
(6) Limited quantities of a drug may be compounded or sterile prepack-
aged prior to receiving a valid prescription drug order based on a history
of receiving valid prescription drug orders for the compounded or sterile
prepackaged product.
(7) Policies and procedures for the compounding or sterile prepackag-
ing of drug products shall ensure the safety, identity, strength, quality,
and purity of the finished product. To meet this standard, licensees and
registrants shall take into consideration the applicable provisions of USP
chapters 795 and 797, and USP-NF chapters 1075 and 1160.
SECTION 44. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1766, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1766. STERILE PREPARATION. (1) The sterility of compounded diag-
nostics, drugs, nutrients, and radiopharmaceuticals shall be maintained
or the compounded drug preparation shall be sterilized when prepared in the
following dosage forms:


(a) Aqueous bronchial and nasal inhalations, except nasal dosage forms
intended for application;
(b) Baths and soaks for live organs and tissues;
(c) Injections such as colloidal dispersions, emulsions, solutions,
and suspensions;
(d) Irrigations for internal body cavities;
(e) Ophthalmic drops and ointments; and
(f) Tissue implants.
(2) Compounders and sterile prepackagers are responsible for ensuring
that sterile products are accurately identified, measured, diluted, and
mixed and are correctly purified, sterilized, packaged, sealed, labeled,
stored, dispensed, and distributed, as well as prepared in a manner that
maintains sterility and minimizes the introduction of particulate matter.
(3) Except when provided for immediate administration, the environment
for the preparation of sterile preparations in a drug outlet shall be in an
isolated area, designed to avoid unnecessary traffic and airflow distur-
bances, and equipped to accommodate aseptic techniques and conditions.
(4) The following shall be documented with respect to any sterile
preparation:
(a) Justification of beyond use dates assigned pursuant to direct test-
ing or extrapolation from reliable literature sources;
(b) Training records evidencing that personnel are trained on a routine
basis and are adequately skilled, educated, and instructed;
(c) Audits appropriate for the risk of contamination for the partic-
ular sterile preparation, including visual inspection, periodic hand
hygiene and garbing competency, gloved fingertip sampling testing,
sterility testing, media-fill test procedures, competency evaluation
at least annually for each compounder, and environmental sampling test-
ing at least upon registration of a new drug outlet, upon the servicing
or re-certification of facilities and equipment, in response to identi-
fied problems, or every six (6) months;
(d) Temperature, logged daily;
(e) Beyond use date and accuracy testing, when appropriate; and
(f) Measuring, mixing, sterilizing, and purification equipment in-
spection, monitoring, cleaning, and maintenance to ensure accuracy and
effectiveness for their intended use.
SECTION 45. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1767, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1767. HAZARDOUS DRUG PREPARATION. This section shall apply to all
persons engaged in the practice of compounding or sterile prepackaging with
hazardous drugs. Such persons shall:
(1) Ensure the storage and compounding areas have sufficient general
exhaust ventilation to dilute and remove airborne contaminants;
(2) Utilize a ventilated cabinet designed to reduce worker exposures
while preparing hazardous drugs. Sterile hazardous drugs shall be prepared
in a dedicated class II biological safety cabinet or a barrier isolator of
appropriate design to meet the personnel exposure limits described in prod-
uct material safety data sheets. When asepsis is not required, a class I


biological safety cabinet, powder containment hood or an isolator intended
for containment applications may be sufficient. A ventilated cabinet that
re-circulates air inside the cabinet or exhausts air back into the room envi-
ronment is prohibited unless:
(a) The hazardous drugs in use will not volatilize while they are being
handled; or
(b) Written documentation from the manufacturer is provided attesting
to the safety of such ventilation.
(3) Clearly identify storage areas, compounding areas, containers, and
prepared doses of hazardous drugs;
(4) Label hazardous drugs with proper precautions, and dispense them in
a manner to minimize risk of hazardous spills;
(5) Provide and maintain appropriate personal protective equipment and
supplies necessary for handling hazardous drugs, spills, and disposal;
(6) Unpack, store, prepackage, and compound hazardous drugs separately
from other inventory in a restricted area in a manner to prevent contami-
nation and personnel exposure until hazardous drugs exist in their final
unity-of-use packaging; and
(7) Ensure that personnel working with hazardous drugs are trained in
hygiene, garbing, receipt, storage, handling, transporting, compounding,
spill control, clean up, disposal, dispensing, medical surveillance, and
environmental quality and control.
SECTION 46. That Section 54-1771, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 47. That Section 37-2716, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2716. REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) Every person who manu-
factures, distributes, prescribes, administers, dispenses, or conducts
research with any controlled substance within this state shall obtain annu-
ally a registration issued by the board in accordance with this chapter and
its rules. Idaho law. All drug outlets with a valid license or registration
under chapter 17, title 54, Idaho Code, are exempt from obtaining a separate
controlled substance registration.
(b) Every prescriber, except veterinarians, shall also register with
the division to obtain online access to the controlled substances prescrip-
tions database.
(c) Persons registered by the board under this chapter may possess,
manufacture, distribute, dispense, prescribe, administer, or conduct re-
search with those substances to the extent authorized by their registration
and licensing entity and in conformity with the other provisions of this
chapter.
(d) The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess
controlled substances under this chapter:
(1) An agent or employee of any person registered pursuant to this chap-
ter, if he is acting in the usual course of his business or employment;
(2) A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an employee
thereof, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual
course of business or employment;


(3) An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled sub-
stance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful posses-
sion of a schedule V substance.
(e) The board may waive by rule the requirement for registration of cer-
tain persons if it finds it consistent with the public health and safety.
(f) (e) A separate registration is required at each principal place
of business or professional practice where the applicant manufactures,
distributes, administers, dispenses, or conducts research with controlled
substances, except a separate registration is not required under this chap-
ter for practitioners engaging in research with nonnarcotic controlled
substances in schedules II through IV where the practitioner is already reg-
istered under this chapter in another capacity.
(g) (f) Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research
with schedule I substances may conduct research with schedule I substances
within this state upon registering in Idaho and furnishing the board with ev-
idence of the practitioner's federal registration.
(h) (g) The board may inspect the establishment of a registrant or
applicant for registration in accordance with this chapter and board rule
Idaho law.
SECTION 48. That Section 37-2730A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
37-2730A. PRESCRIPTION TRACKING PROGRAM. (1) The division shall main-
tain a program to track the prescriptions for controlled substances that are
filed with the division under section 37-2726, Idaho Code, for the purpose
of assisting in identifying illegal activity related to the dispensing of
controlled substances and for the purpose of assisting the division in pro-
viding information to patients, practitioners and pharmacists to assist in
avoiding inappropriate use of controlled substances. The tracking program
and any data created thereby shall be administered by the division. Data
collected pursuant to this subsection shall be reported by the end of the
business day by all drug outlets that dispense controlled substances in or
into Idaho for human patients.
(2) The division shall use the information obtained through the
tracking program in identifying activity it reasonably suspects may be in
violation of this chapter or medical assistance law. The division shall
report this information to the individuals and persons set forth in section
37-2726(2), Idaho Code. The division may release unsolicited information
to pharmacists and practitioners when the release of information may be of
assistance in preventing or avoiding inappropriate use of controlled sub-
stances. The division may provide the appropriate law enforcement agency,
medicaid or medicare agency, or licensing board with the relevant infor-
mation in the division's possession, including information obtained from
the tracking program, for further investigation or other appropriate law
enforcement or administrative enforcement use.
(3) Information that does not identify individual patients, practi-
tioners, or dispensing pharmacists or pharmacies may be released by the
division for educational, research, or public information purposes.


(4) Nothing herein shall prevent a pharmacist or practitioner from fur-
nishing another pharmacist or practitioner information obtained pursuant to
and in compliance with this chapter.
(5) Unless there is shown malice or criminal intent or gross negligence
or reckless, willful and wanton conduct as defined in section 6-904C, Idaho
Code, the state of Idaho, the division, any other state agency, or any person
or entity in proper possession of information as herein provided shall not be
subject to any liability or action for money damages or other legal or equi-
table relief by reason of any of the following:
(a) The furnishing of information under the conditions herein pro-
vided;
(b) The receiving and use of, or reliance on, such information;
(c) The fact that any such information was not furnished; or
(d) The fact that such information was factually incorrect or was re-
leased by the division to the wrong person or entity.
(6) The division may apply for any available grants and accept any
gifts, grants or donations to assist in developing and maintaining the pro-
gram required by this section.
SECTION 49. That Section 54-5705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5705. PROVIDER-PATIENT RELATIONSHIP. A provider may provide vir-
tual care to a patient if such provider has first established a provider-pa-
tient relationship with the patient, the patient has a provider-patient
relationship with another provider in the provider group, the provider is
covering calls for a provider with an established relationship with the
patient, or the provider is performing any activities set forth in section
54-1733(2)(3), Idaho Code. A provider-patient relationship may be estab-
lished by use of virtual care technologies, provided that the applicable
Idaho community standard of care is satisfied.
SECTION 50. The rules contained in IDAPA 24.36.01, Division of Occu-
pational and Professional Licenses, Rules of the Idaho State Board of Phar-
macy, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1,
2025.
SECTION 51. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.